Hawaii statutes.
§27-21.6 Functions reassigned to the
counties. The following functions are hereby reassigned to the several
counties:

(1) The medical care of inmates of county jails;

(2) The rendering of medical investigatory services
requested by the police;

(3) Physical examinations of employees to the extent
that such functions had been performed immediately prior to the adoption of Act
97, Session Laws of Hawaii 1965;

(4) The care and treatment of county workers'
compensation cases to the extent that such functions had been performed
immediately prior to the adoption of Act 97, Session Laws of Hawaii 1965; and

(5) The regulation of the design, construction, and
operation of individual wastewater systems and private wastewater treatment
works; provided that:

(A) The transfer of this function to each
county shall take place on the date that the expenditure of start-up funds is
made by the State to such county for this purpose; and

(B) The counties may approve the installation
and use of composting toilets in areas that are inaccessible to municipal
wastewater systems. As used in this subparagraph, "composting
toilet" means a toilet that uses no water or very little water and uses
natural processes to treat waste. [L 1969, c 265, §6; am L 1975, c 41, §1; am L
1978, c 148, §3; am L 1985, c 282, §1; am L 2015, c 187, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next